California, session 20252026, AB2520.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1799.1 of the Civil Code is amended to read:1799.1. (a) No business entity which that performs bookkeeping services shall disclose in whole or in part the contents of any record, including the disclosure of information in the record in any composite of information, which information that is prepared or maintained by such the business entity to any person, person other than the individual or business entity which that is the subject of the record, without the express written consent of such the individual or business entity.(b) This section shall not apply to the following:(1) To a disclosure to any person pursuant to a subpoena or court order.(2) To a disclosure which that is discoverable.(3) To a disclosure to any person acting pursuant to a lawful search warrant.(4) To a disclosure to a law enforcement agency when if required for investigations of criminal activity, unless such the disclosure is prohibited by law.(5) To a disclosure to a taxing agency for purposes of tax administration.